Louisiana, session 2026, HB181.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:513(Q) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§513. Powers and duties of legislative auditor; audit reports as public records;
assistance and opinions of attorney general; frequency of audits; subpoena
power
* * *
Q. The legislative auditor may access individual-level state income tax return
data in accordance with R.S. 47:1508(B)(44) for the limited purposes of ensuring
accuracy of Medicaid and Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program eligibility
determinations, detecting and preventing fraud in the Medicaid program and
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 181 ENROLLED
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, and fulfilling all other applicable
requirements of the Medical Assistance Programs Integrity Law, R.S. 46:437.1 et
seq.
Section 2. R.S. 47:1508(B)(44) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1508. Confidentiality of tax records
* * *
B. Nothing contained in this Section shall be construed to prevent:
* * *
(44)(a) The secretary from disclosing individual-level state income tax return
data to the legislative auditor, upon request of the legislative auditor, exclusively for
the purposes specified in this Paragraph.
(b) The legislative auditor shall utilize data disclosed pursuant to this
Paragraph for only the following purposes:
(i) Ensuring accuracy of Medicaid and Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program eligibility determinations.
(ii) Detecting and preventing fraud in the Medicaid program and
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(iii) Fulfilling the requirements of the Medical Assistance Programs Integrity
Law, R.S. 46:437.1 et seq.
(c) The secretary shall enter into any memorandum of understanding,
cooperative endeavor, or other type of agreement as may be necessary to facilitate
the sharing of data with the legislative auditor for the purposes set forth in this
Paragraph.
(d) Any disclosure authorized pursuant to this Paragraph shall comply with
applicable federal law, including 26 U.S.C. 6103.
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 181 ENROLLED
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.